District of Columbia statutes.
6-601.08

Violation of subchapter.

Buildings erected, altered, or raised or converted in violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter, are hereby declared to be common nuisances; and the owner or the person in charge of or maintaining any such buildings, upon conviction on information filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any of his assistants in the name of said District, and which said Court is hereby authorized to hear and determine such cases, shall be adjudged guilty of maintaining a common nuisance, and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $100 per day for each and every day such nuisance shall be permitted to continue, and shall be required by said Court to abate such nuisance. The Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia may maintain an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia, to abate and perpetually enjoin such nuisance. The injunction shall be granted at the commencement of the action, and no bond shall be required. Any person violating the terms of any injunction granted in such proceeding shall be punished as for contempt by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500, or by imprisonment in the Washington Asylum and Jail for not less than 30 days nor more than 6 months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the Court.

June 1, 1910, 36 Stat. 454, ch. 263, § 8
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a), (c)(18)
1981 Ed., § 5-408.
1973 Ed., § 5-408.